Arkansas, session 2025, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Reimbursement rate for mental health services and services
related to addiction.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall:
(1) Set the reimbursement rate for mental health services and
services related to addiction to at least one hundred percent (100%) of the
Medicare reimbursement rate for the comparable service; and
(2) Reimburse for any mental health service or service related
to addiction that is offered or provided in the surrounding states.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.

*JMB070*
01-16-2025 15:03:52 JMB070

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1029
/s/D. Garner



































01-16-2025 15:03:52 JMB070